Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 42 Ancillary Administration
28-42-109. Transfer of residue to domiciliary personal representative.

Any movable assets remaining in the hands of the ancillary personal representative after the payment of all claims allowed in this state may by the court be ordered transferred to the personal representative in the domiciliary jurisdiction.

This transfer may be conditioned upon satisfactory evidence being furnished to the court that the domiciliary personal representative has given bond sufficient for the protection of the estate and persons interested in the estate with respect to the property so transferred.

Upon good cause shown, the court may order the sale of local assets by the ancillary personal representative for the purpose of transmitting the proceeds to the domiciliary personal representative.

The date of the death of the nonresident decedent;

That no local administration, or application or petition therefor, is pending in this state; and

That the domiciliary foreign personal representative is entitled to payment or delivery.

Payment or delivery under subsection (a) of this section may not be made if a resident creditor of the nonresident decedent has notified the debtor of the nonresident decedent or the person having possession of the personal property belonging to the nonresident decedent that the debt should not be paid nor the property delivered to the domiciliary foreign personal representative.

Ark. L. Rev.

Leflar, Conflict of Laws: Arkansas, 1978-82, 36 Ark. L. Rev. 191.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Legislative Survey, Decedents' Estates, 4 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 591.

Receiving payment of money, or taking delivery of personal property under § 28-42-110; or

Doing any act as a personal representative in this state which would have given the state jurisdiction over him or her as an individual.

Ark. L. Rev.

Leflar, Conflict of Laws: Arkansas, 1978-82, 36 Ark. L. Rev. 191.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Legislative Survey, Decedents' Estates, 4 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 591.

[Reserved]

ALR.

Enforceability of contractual right, in which fiduciary has interest, to purchase property of estate or trust. 6 A.L.R.4th 786.

Who is resident within meaning of statute prohibiting appointment of nonresident executor or administrator. 9 A.L.R.4th 1223.

Adverse interest or position as disqualification for appointment of administrator, executor, or other personal representative. 11 A.L.R.4th 638.

Attorney's delay in handling decedent's estate as ground for disciplinary action. 21 A.L.R.4th 75.

Ark. L. Rev.

Acts 1949 General Assembly—Act 140 The Probate Code, 3 Ark. L. Rev. 375.

Effective Dates. Acts 1957, No. 297, § 4: Mar. 27, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly has ascertained that there are now pending in this State a great number of estates of deceased persons and that many more such cases will arise annually in the various counties of this State, and that an urgent need exists for a legislative establishment of a definite and uniform schedule of legal fees to be changed as expenses of such estates to assist the Probate Judges of the State and for the guidance of the personal representatives and attorneys, and for the information of the heirs and beneficiaries of estates of decedents, for the accomplishment of which this Act is adopted. An emergency is, therefore, declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, welfare and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 620, § 16: July 1, 1975.

Acts 2015, No. 844, § 2: Jan. 1, 2016.

ALR.

Delay of executor or administrator in filing inventory, account, or other report, or in completing administration and distribution of estate, as ground for removal. 33 A.L.R.4th 708.

Am. Jur. 31 Am. Jur. 2d, Exec. & Ad., § 42 et seq.

C.J.S. 33 C.J.S., Exec. & Ad., § 17 et seq.

To one (1) or more of the persons entitled to a distributive share of the estate, or his or her nominee, as the court in its discretion may determine, if application for letters is made within forty (40) days after the death of the decedent, in case there is a surviving spouse and, if no surviving spouse, within thirty (30) days after the death of the decedent; and

To any other qualified person.

A person whom the court finds unsuitable; or

A natural person who is a nonresident of this state, unless he or she shall have appointed the clerk of the court in which the proceedings are pending, and the clerk's successors in office, or some person residing in the county of probate and approved by the court, as agent to accept service of process and notice in all actions and proceedings with respect to the estate.

If a person other than the clerk who has been appointed process agent dies, becomes incompetent, or removes from the county, the clerk and his or her successors in office shall become the process agent.

The appointment or agency may be revoked only upon the appointment of a qualified substitute agent.

Upon the service of any process or notice on the agent, he or she shall immediately transmit the process or notice to the personal representative by registered or certified mail, requesting a return receipt.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment, in the introductory language of (b), substituted “A person is not” for “No person is” and “if the person” for “who”; and substituted “eighteen (18)” for “twenty-one (21)” in (b)(1).

Ark. L. Rev.

Notices Under the Probate Code, 8 Ark. L. Rev. 324.

A chancery court's refusal to remove testamentary trustee on ground of trustee's absence in the military service, where it appeared he was not neglecting the trust estate, was not an abuse of discretion. Blumenstiel v. Morris, 207 Ark. 244, 180 S.W.2d 107 (1944) (decision under prior law).

This section does not make it compulsory on a court to make an appointment in the order of priority mentioned, and for sufficient cause and in unusual circumstances, as where the applicant of that class is not qualified or, in the court's opinion, will not best manage and improve the estate, the court may refuse an appointment though the applicant is otherwise qualified. Burnett v. United States Fid. & Guar. Co., 228 Ark. 857, 310 S.W.2d 806 (1958); Knight v. Worthen Bank & Trust Co., 233 Ark. 465, 345 S.W.2d 361 (1961).

Although a court is not bound to appoint from the highest priority nominees if it finds sufficient cause or unusual circumstances, in the absence of unusual circumstances or sufficient cause, it is the duty of the court to follow the statutes such as this section as set out by the General Assembly. McEntire v. McEntire, 265 Ark. 260, 577 S.W.2d 607 (1979).

Where two or more persons are named as executors, the renunciation or refusal of one to join or take upon himself the execution of a will cannot be evidenced by acts in pais, but must be shown by matter of record. Newton v. Cocke, 10 Ark. (5 English) 169 (1849) (decision under prior law).

Personal representation discharged and released the estate from her right to seek appointment that she otherwise had pursuant to the probate code and the terms of the will. Green v. McAuley, 59 Ark. App. 114, 953 S.W.2d 66 (1997).

Father of minor child killed in automobile accident though divorced was qualified to act as administrator of child where mother who had custody was permanently injured in same accident. Smith v. Rudolph, 221 Ark. 900, 256 S.W.2d 736 (1953).

Paternal grandmother of decedent was qualified to serve as administratrix even though she was not entitled to a distributive share, because she had been nominated by persons who were. Wisdom v. McBride, 311 Ark. 492, 845 S.W.2d 6 (1993).

An administrator cum testamento annexo is liable to the same provisions of the law as other administrators, except that he distributes the estate according to the will. Whitlow v. Patterson, 195 Ark. 173, 112 S.W.2d 35 (1937) (decision under prior law).

A nineteen-year-old widow, although disqualified to serve as administrator of her deceased husband's estate, was not precluded from the right to nominate an administrator. Brod v. Brod, 227 Ark. 723, 301 S.W.2d 448, 64 A.L.R.2d 1147 (1957).

Where a widow failed or refused to administer the estate of her deceased husband, a creditor had a preferential right to move for the appointment of an administrator. Lineback v. Howerton, 181 Ark. 433, 26 S.W.2d 74 (1930) (decision under prior law).

Decedent's father and the decedent's uncle, who was the nominee of his mother, shared equal priority as nominees under (a)(3). In re Estate of Robinson, 36 Ark. App. 1, 816 S.W.2d 896 (1991).

Persons named as a preferred class are subject to the conditions that an administrator must be qualified and must, in the opinion of the court, be the person who can best manage and improve an estate. Woodruff v. Miller, 209 Ark. 759, 192 S.W.2d 527 (1946) (decision under prior law).

Appointment of an unpardoned felon as a personal representative was voidable, rather than void ab initio, because (1) the court or parties did not know the personal representative was unqualified, so the court had jurisdiction to appoint the personal representative under §§28-48-101 to28-48-103, and (2) another was appointed once the personal representative's disqualification was known.In re Estate of L.C. Taylor v. MCSA, LLC, 2013 Ark. 429, 430 S.W.3d 120 (2013).

Appointment of an unpardoned felon as a personal representative was voidable, rather than void ab initio, because (1) §28-1-115(b) states that no vacation of a probate court order affects a prior act, (2) §28-48-105(b) states that removing a personal representative does not invalidate prior official acts, and (3) §28-48-102(d)(2) also provides that a personal representative's acts before removal are valid.In re Estate of L.C. Taylor v. MCSA, LLC, 2013 Ark. 429, 430 S.W.3d 120 (2013).

Trial court should not weigh votes of distributees for administrator of an estate in the order of descent, as prescribed in §28-9-214, but even if it did so, if the trial court were to find a tie-vote for administrator of an estate at the first level of priority, it would be logical to proceed to the next level to break the tie. Wisdom v. McBride, 311 Ark. 492, 845 S.W.2d 6 (1993).

Cited: Sides v. Haynes, 181 F. Supp. 889 (W.D. Ark. 1960); Roberson v. Hamilton, 240 Ark. 898, 405 S.W.2d 253 (1966); Standridge v. Standridge, 304 Ark. 364, 803 S.W.2d 496 (1991); In re Vesa, 319 Ark. 574, 892 S.W.2d 491 (1995).

When a duly appointed personal representative has given such bond as may be required and the bond has been approved by the court or by the clerk, subject to confirmation by the court, or, if no bond is required, when the personal representative has filed with the clerk a written acceptance of his or her appointment, letters under the seal of the court shall be issued to him or her.

The letters shall be in substantially the following form:

Letters of administration with will annexed, administration in succession, and special administration shall conform with this form with appropriate modifications.(d)(1)(A)Letters of administration are not necessary to empower the person appointed to act for the estate.

Letters of administration are for the purpose of notifying third parties that the appointment of an administrator has been made.

The order appointing the administrator empowers the administrator to act for the estate, and any act carried out under the authority of the order is valid.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment added (d).

The 2013 amendment substituted “Circuit” for “Probate” in (b).

Ark. L. Rev.

Recent Development: Arkansas Act 438 of 2007, 60 Ark. L. Rev. 1023.

Trial court erred in awarding summary judgment to defendants in a wrongful death and survival action brought by a patient's relatives where Acts 2007, chapter 438, amending this section, provided that letters of administration were not necessary to empower a person appointed to act for an estate. Chapter 438 was procedural and was meant to be applied retroactively.Steward v. Statler, 371 Ark. 351, 266 S.W.3d 710 (2007), rehearing denied, — Ark. —, — S.W.3d —, 2007 Ark. LEXIS 662 (Dec. 6, 2007).

Trial court erred in awarding summary judgment to a doctor in personal representative's medical malpractice and wrongful death action because under this section, it was an order of appointment, not letters of administration, that empowered the personal representative to act on behalf of the patient's estate.Estate of Banks v. Wilkin, 101 Ark. App. 156, 272 S.W.3d 137 (2008).

The 2007 amendment of this section is to be applied retroactively.Estate of Banks v. Wilkin, 101 Ark. App. 156, 272 S.W.3d 137 (2008).

The probate of a will authorizes the grant of letters testamentary, but, until letters are ordered issued, it gives no authority over the estate. Jackson v. Reeve, 44 Ark. 496 (1884) (decision under prior law).

Administratrix was not required to have executed letters of administration in order to file a complaint against the medical center on June 10, 2003, because the order appointing her administratrix was entered before the complaint was filed, was effective at the time the complaint was filed, and empowered her to act for the estate without the necessity of letters of administration.Brown v. Nat'l Health Care of Pocahontas, Inc., 102 Ark. App. 148, 283 S.W.3d 224 (2008).

Son, a foreign administrator of his mother's estate, was subject to the requirements for domiciliary personal representatives pursuant to §16-61-110, and therefore was required to have been appointed under this section. Because the son had not been appointed administrator of his mother's estate in any state at the time he filed his original complaint for trespass and conversion of timber, he did not have standing to sue; because the complaint was a nullity, a second complaint could not relate back under Ark. R. Civ. P. 15(c).Travis Lumber Co. v. Deichman, 2009 Ark. 299, 319 S.W.3d 239 (2009).

A release by one of two joint administrators of a note payable to them in their representative capacity was ineffectual to bar recovery thereon. Clark v. Gramling, 54 Ark. 525, 16 S.W. 475 (1891) (decision under prior law).

Appointment of an unpardoned felon as a personal representative was voidable, rather than void ab initio, because (1) §28-1-115(b) states that no vacation of a probate court order affects a prior act, (2) §28-48-105(b) states that removing a personal representative does not invalidate prior official acts, and (3) subdivision (d)(2) of this section also provides that a personal representative's acts before removal are valid.In re Estate of L.C. Taylor v. MCSA, LLC, 2013 Ark. 429, 430 S.W.3d 120 (2013).

For good cause shown, a special administrator may be appointed pending the appointment of an executor or a general administrator or after the appointment of an executor or a general administrator, with or without the removal of the executor or general administrator.

A special administrator may be appointed without notice or upon such notice as the court may direct.

The appointment may be for a specified time, to perform duties respecting specific property or to perform particular acts, as stated in the order of appointment.

The special administrator shall make such reports as the court shall direct and shall account to the court upon the termination of his or her authority.

Otherwise, and except when the provisions of the Probate Code by their terms apply only to general personal representatives, and except as ordered by the court, the law and procedure relating to personal representatives shall apply to special administrators.

The order appointing a special administrator shall not be appealable.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

No appeal is allowed from an order refusing to appoint a special administrator. In re Estate of McLaughlin, 306 Ark. 515, 815 S.W.2d 937 (1991).

Under §28-1-116, any order of a probate court is generally appealable, but under subsection (f) of this section, there can be no appeal from an order appointing or refusing to appoint a special administrator; however, the denial or granting of a petition to remove an executor or administrator, other than a special administrator, is an appealable order. Pickens v. Black, 316 Ark. 499, 872 S.W.2d 405 (1994).

There can be no appeal from an order refusing to appoint a special administrator. Harwood v. Monroe, 65 Ark. App. 57, 984 S.W.2d 93 (1999).

A trial court was authorized to appoint a special administrator to appeal a decision setting aside the will of a deceased where the executor, due to relationship to parties concerned, did not want to take an appeal. Thiel v. Mobley, 223 Ark. 167, 265 S.W.2d 507 (1954).

A special administrator cannot be appointed solely to assert such rights as a claimant might have had against a decedent's insurance carrier. Doepke v. Smith, 248 Ark. 511, 452 S.W.2d 627 (1970).

There is no authority for the appointment of a special administrator solely for the purpose of receiving proceeds in an action for damages alleged to have resulted from the negligence of a decedent where the prospective plaintiff alleged that the insurance carrier of the decedent fraudulently induced him to delay prosecution of his claim until the time for filing a claim against the estate had expired by falsely representing that it would settle the claim as soon as plaintiff's injuries could be evaluated. Doepke v. Smith, 248 Ark. 511, 452 S.W.2d 627 (1970).

There was no question that the probate court had jurisdiction to appoint a special administrator in order to perform the particular acts of litigating wrongful death and life insurance actions. Douglas v. Holbert, 335 Ark. 305, 983 S.W.2d 392 (1998), US Supreme Court cert. denied, Bates v. Arkansas, 526 U.S. 1064, 119 S. Ct. 1454, 143 L. Ed. 2d 541 (1999).

Where the heirs at law attacked probate of a will and filed petitions asking for the removal of the executor on the ground that he failed to include certain assets in the inventory and while matters were pending, the probate court granted a petition for appointment of a special administrator for purpose of filing proceedings against executors and others, the appointment of the special administrator was proper since the probate court had original and exclusive jurisdiction to appoint a special administrator. Breshears v. Williams, 223 Ark. 368, 265 S.W.2d 956 (1954).

This section authorizes a court to appoint a nonresident as a special administrator. Evans v. Cano Del Castillo, 220 Ark. 350, 247 S.W.2d 947 (1952).

The appointment of Mexican counsel for purpose of filing a wrongful death action on behalf of a deceased was an appointment of a special administrator. Evans v. Cano Del Castillo, 220 Ark. 350, 247 S.W.2d 947 (1952).

An order appointing a nonresident as a special administrator is not appealable. Evans v. Cano Del Castillo, 220 Ark. 350, 247 S.W.2d 947 (1952).

The appointment of a special administrator for the purpose of service in order to fix venue in damage suit based on the negligence of deceased was erroneous, but was valid until order of appointment was vacated, since order was voidable. Nickles v. Wood, 221 Ark. 630, 255 S.W.2d 433 (1953).

Service in a damage suit on a special administrator appointed for that purpose was valid though the special administrator was thereafter removed and a general administrator appointed. Nickles v. Wood, 221 Ark. 630, 255 S.W.2d 433 (1953).

Order appointing the administratrix on April 11, 2003, as special administratrix specifically stated that the term was for six months; thus, her term expired on October 11, 2003, before she filed complaints against all of the appellees except for the medical center; unless a person was the personal representative or executor of the estate at the time of filing, he had no standing to file a complaint on behalf of the estate and any complaint filed was a nullity, and because the administratrix's complaint was a nullity, her nonsuit on December 6, 2004, did not dismiss these complaints; it dismissed only the properly filed complaint against the medical center, and because the first complaints filed were nullities, the November 17, 2005 complaint was the first complaint filed by a properly appointed personal representative and no savings statute applied; thus, the administratrix's complaint against the medical personnel was barred by the statute of limitations.Brown v. Nat'l Health Care of Pocahontas, Inc., 102 Ark. App. 148, 283 S.W.3d 224 (2008).

Probate division of the circuit court had the authority under §28-53-119 and this section to appoint a special administrator for the limited purpose of pursuing unliquidated tort claims that were not addressed before the estate of the special administrator's parent was closed. Although the circuit court did not use the word “reopen” in its order, its intent was clear enough because it found that the decedent's estate was opened and closed without resolving wrongful death or survival claims and that a special administrator was necessary to pursue the claims.Arman v. Chi St. Vincent Hot Springs, 2019 Ark. App. 187, 574 S.W.3d 731 (2019).

Cited: Constitution State Ins. Co. v. Passmore, 18 Ark. App. 247, 713 S.W.2d 255 (1986); Guess v. Going, 62 Ark. App. 19, 966 S.W.2d 930 (1998); Filyaw v. Bouton, 87 Ark. App. 320, 191 S.W.3d 540 (2004); Heritage Props. Ltd. P'ship v. Walt & Lee Keenihan Found., Inc., 2019 Ark. 371, 584 S.W.3d 685 (2019).

The plain language of this section clearly mandates that in situations where there are more than two executors of a decedent's estate the powers given to them may be exercised only by the joint action of the majority of them, unless otherwise provided by the will. Dunklin v. Ramsay, 328 Ark. 263, 944 S.W.2d 76 (1997).

Ark. L. Rev.

Mark James Chaney, Recent Developments: Arkansas Supreme Court Holds the Appointment of a Special Personal Representative to an Estate Is Voidable, but Not Void, upon the Discovery of a Disqualifying Characteristic, 66 Ark. L. Rev. 1145 (2013).

The denial or granting of a petition to remove an executor or administrator, other than a special administrator, is an appealable order. Pickens v. Black, 316 Ark. 499, 872 S.W.2d 405 (1994).

Where no evidence or testimony was produced at the hearing to provide any basis for removing the administrator, record before the Supreme Court, consisting solely of the pleadings, did not prove that the probate court committed error as a matter of law in retaining the administrator and holding that alleged conflicts or mismanagement would be cured by appointing a special administrator to pursue appeal of judgment against the estate. Newton County v. West, 288 Ark. 432, 705 S.W.2d 887 (1986).

Where motion was made to have person removed as administrator of estate and probate court responded by appointing a special administrator to appeal court decision adverse to the estate but retained such person as administrator for all other purposes, the burden was on movant to present a record on appeal demonstrating that the probate court's decision was clearly erroneous, and in the absence of that showing, the Supreme Court would not reverse. Newton County v. West, 288 Ark. 432, 705 S.W.2d 887 (1986).

Appointment of an unpardoned felon as a personal representative was voidable, rather than void ab initio, because (1) §28-1-115(b) states that no vacation of a probate court order affects a prior act, (2) subsection (b) of this section states that removing a personal representative does not invalidate prior official acts, and (3) §28-48-102(d)(2) also provides that a personal representative's acts before removal are valid.In re Estate of L.C. Taylor v. MCSA, LLC, 2013 Ark. 429, 430 S.W.3d 120 (2013).

Where the personal representative of the estate of a person killed in a traffic collision contracted with attorneys to file a wrongful death action, the contract did not confer a vested right on the attorneys to carry the death action to a conclusion, and a successor representative could engage other attorneys. Gentry v. Richardson, 228 Ark. 677, 309 S.W.2d 721 (1958).

Beneficiaries may prefer to have independent counsel to protect their interests in a wrongful death suit, but as long as the code provides that the personal representative is the party to bring the action, that party has the absolute right to choose counsel for that purpose. Should the personal representative or chosen council fail to provide adequate representation, application can be made to the probate court to either not approve or disallow the contracts entered into by the representative, and a representative can be removed pursuant to this section if the court finds him unsuitable. Brewer v. Lacefield, 301 Ark. 358, 784 S.W.2d 156 (1990).

Service of process in a suit on a special administrator appointed for that purpose is valid though the special administrator is thereafter removed and a general administrator appointed. Nickles v. Wood, 221 Ark. 630, 255 S.W.2d 433 (1953).

It was no excuse for disobedience of a citation issued pursuant to a statute that an administrator had filed an account several years before which the court had not acted upon. Ex parte Pearce, 44 Ark. 509 (1884) (decision under prior law).

Circuit court did not abuse its discretion in not removing a coexecutor as one of the coexecutors of a decedent's estate, under this section, because (1) although the circuit court found that the coexecutor had made some errors as one of the coexecutors, it also found that the coexecutor was not intentionally attempting to harm the widow; (2) the circuit court did not find that any of the coexecutor's actions endangered the estate property or that they were intended to harm any party; and (3) the circuit court weighed the coexecutor's actions, both positive and negative, and found that, on balance, the positive benefits to the estate outweighed the negative.Taylor v. Woods, 102 Ark. App. 92, 282 S.W.3d 285 (2008), rehearing denied, — Ark. App. —, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Ark. App. LEXIS 625 (Aug. 20, 2008).

Trial court did not clearly err in granting a mother's petition to replace a father as guardian of their 21-year-old son, who had Williams syndrome, because the son needed a guardian who was vigilant in ensuring that his needs were met; there were several occasions where the father delayed or denied the son medical attention.Hoffarth v. Harp, 2009 Ark. App. 240, 303 S.W.3d 96 (2009), rehearing denied, — Ark. App. —, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Ark. App. LEXIS 684 (May 6, 2009), review denied, — Ark. —, — S.W.3d —, 2009 Ark. LEXIS 575 (Sept. 10, 2009).

Where an administrator failed to give bond, failed to receive letters of administration, and generally failed to carry out her duties as an administrator and her health did not permit her to perform these duties, she should have been removed by the court as she was unsuitable and incapable of discharging her trust and had failed to perform the duties imposed by law. Davis v. Adams, 231 Ark. 197, 328 S.W.2d 851 (1959).

Where an administrator failed to file a satisfactory account, although admonished to do so some thirteen years earlier, and where she had persistently acted in furtherance of her own interests in a manner to deprive her stepchildren of benefits, she should be removed. Price v. Price, 258 Ark. 363, 527 S.W.2d 322 (1975).

Although the personal representative may not have done everything he should have done to keep the estate's assets properly maintained, and had made partial distribution without court approval as required by statute, since the right people had received the money and could reimburse it if necessary, insufficient grounds for removal pursuant to subdivision (a)(1) of this section were shown. Jones v. Balentine, 44 Ark. App. 62, 866 S.W.2d 829 (1993).

There was no error in the probate judge's refusal to find any breach of fiduciary duty that would require removal of the executrix. Morris v. Cullipher, 306 Ark. 646, 816 S.W.2d 878 (1991).

Where the evidence showed that two sisters' joint guardianship of a third sister's estate was marked by continual quarreling and bickering, the best interests of ward demanded termination of the guardianship, since the guardians in such circumstances were incapable of satisfactorily performing the duties imposed upon them by law and the courts. Omohundro v. Erhart, 228 Ark. 910, 311 S.W.2d 309 (1958).

In a will contest in which a trust was involved, instructions which told the jury that the testator could appoint whom she pleased for executor of her will and also that probate court had right to remove executor and appoint another in proper case were not erroneous. Bocquin v. Theurer, 133 Ark. 448, 202 S.W. 845 (1918), superseded by statute as stated in, Priola v. Priola, 237 Ark. 798, 377 S.W.2d 29 (Ark. 1964) (decision under prior law).

Where the decedent died testate and left them nothing under the will, the decedent's surviving children were not heirs and were not creditors, and were thus not “interested persons” as that term is used in §§28-1-102(a)(11),28-48-107(a), and subdivision (a)(2) of this section. Pickens v. Black, 316 Ark. 499, 872 S.W.2d 405 (1994).

By the service of a citation, a probate court obtained jurisdiction of the person of an administrator, and any action thereafter revoking his letters, restating his accounts, rejecting former settlements, or ordering distribution of money on hand was within the jurisdiction of the court and not void. Ex parte Pearce, 44 Ark. 509 (1884) (decision under prior law).

This section authorizes the removal of a personal representative on the court's own motion, provided the removal order complies otherwise with this section's requirements. In re Vesa, 319 Ark. 574, 892 S.W.2d 491 (1995).

Decision not to remove the personal representatives was not clearly erroneous, because the appellate court could not say that the circuit courts decision had left a definite and firm conviction that a mistake had been committed, when the circuit court admonished the personal representatives to put the widow's interests above their own since they owed her a fiduciary duty, and the circuit court understood that there was animosity but noted that there would be court supervision of the probate process.Ashley v. Ashley, 2012 Ark. App. 236, 405 S.W.3d 419 (2012).

Cited: Cude v. Cude, 286 Ark. 383, 691 S.W.2d 866 (1985); Jones v. Jones, 301 Ark. 367, 784 S.W.2d 161 (1990); White v. Welsh, 323 Ark. 479, 915 S.W.2d 274 (1996); Schenebeck v. Schenebeck, 329 Ark. 198, 947 S.W.2d 367 (1997); Holmes v. McClendon, 349 Ark. 162, 76 S.W.3d 836 (2002).

An order of a probate court appointing an administrator in succession after the former administrator's final settlement had been approved was without jurisdiction and void. Beckett v. Whittington, 92 Ark. 230, 122 S.W. 633 (1909) (decision under prior law).

Personal representative discharged and released the estate from her right to seek appointment that she otherwise had pursuant to the Probate Code and the terms of the will. Green v. McAuley, 59 Ark. App. 114, 953 S.W.2d 66 (1997).

It is within a court's discretion to refuse to permit an interested party to serve as an administrator in succession of an estate where an accounting proceeding has been instituted, since such a party would thereby be assuming the dual role of assailant and defender of the accounting proceeding. Burnett v. United States Fid. & Guar. Co., 228 Ark. 857, 310 S.W.2d 806 (1958).

Where allowing the administrator to resign did not affect the venue fixed in the actions already filed against the estate and remedies were available for the appointment of a successor administrator, the probate judge did not abuse his discretion in permitting the administrator to resign. Barkley v. Cullum, 252 Ark. 474, 479 S.W.2d 535 (1972).

Where appellant, as administrator in succession, received without objection from her predecessor certain notes secured by mortgage belonging to the estate, sued and foreclosed the mortgage, both she and her wards, heirs of the deceased, were estopped thereafter to sue her predecessor for the money which the notes represented. Meyer v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 197 Ark. 418, 122 S.W.2d 586 (1938) (decision under prior law).

Upon the insolvency of a bank designated by a testator as his executor and trustee, the chancery court, independently of any provision in a will, properly appointed a trustee in succession. Bieatt v. Echols, 181 Ark. 235, 25 S.W.2d 431 (1930) (decision under prior law).

Where a suit had been filed against an estate at a time when the estate had an administrator and the administrator petitioned the court to resign, the parties filing the suit were interested parties and aggrieved parties for the purposes of appealing from probate court orders allowing the administrator to resign. Barkley v. Cullum, 252 Ark. 474, 479 S.W.2d 535 (1972).

Where the decedent died testate and left them nothing under the will, the decedent's surviving children were not heirs and were not creditors, and were thus not “interested persons” as that term is used in §§28-1-102(a)(11),28-48-105(a)(2), and subsection (a) of this section. Pickens v. Black, 316 Ark. 499, 872 S.W.2d 405 (1994).

The necessity for appointment of an administrator de bonis non having been adjudged by probate court was held to be conclusive in a collateral issue. Stewart v. Smiley, 46 Ark. 373 (1885) (decision under prior law).

The extent of the power of an administrator de bonis non was held to collect and administer such property and effects of the deceased as were unadministered by the former representative, as remained in specie, and were capable of being ascertained and identified as the specific property of the estate represented by him. Finn v. Hempstead, 24 Ark. (11 Barber) 111 (1863) (decision under prior law).

An administrator in succession must proceed in the probate court against the former executor or administrator for a settlement or an accounting and an order to pay over the sum found due him before he can sue the bondsmen of the former executor or administrator. Statham v. Brooke, 140 Ark. 187, 215 S.W. 581 (1919) (decision under prior law).

It is not necessary to the validity of the judgment of the circuit court against a deceased administrator's estate relative to his account that it should be presented to his executors. McLain v. Sprigg, 174 Ark. 1052, 298 S.W. 870 (1927) (decision under prior law).

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

Ark. L. Rev.

Analyzing the Estate, 21 Ark. L. Rev. 1.

This section provides formulas to compensate personal representatives and attorneys, but does not limit the type of allowable administrative claims. Eddins v. Style Optics, Inc., 71 Ark. App. 102, 35 S.W.3d 315 (2000).

The fact that an administrator was authorized by a probate court to institute a suit to recover in proper forum an amount due the estate and employ attorneys, did not give the court in which the suit was instituted jurisdiction to distribute the attorney's fees; rather, the entire fund recovered became the property of the estate to be administered by the probate court. Gilleylen v. Hallman, 141 Ark. 52, 216 S.W. 15 (1919) (decision under prior law).

Where the value of the personalty plus real property was $1,484,200, the attorney's fee of $22,500 was not excessive. Sloss v. Farmers Bank & Trust Co., 290 Ark. 304, 719 S.W.2d 273 (1986).

Amount of attorneys' fees awarded held proper. Adams v. West, 293 Ark. 192, 736 S.W.2d 4 (1987).

This section authorizes the probate court to increase or decrease legal fees in accordance with the value of legal services rendered. Nabers v. Estate of Setser, 310 Ark. 194, 833 S.W.2d 375 (1992).

Award of attorney fees to siblings' brother for legal work on their mother's estate was appropriate because the trial court's order recited the factors taken into consideration in making the award, which was approximately one-third less than the amount authorized by this section. Rollins v. Rollins, 94 Ark. App. 65, 224 S.W.3d 554 (2006).

Fees awarded to an estate's attorney from a testator's son were not excessive under subdivision (d)(3) of this section because the attorney's statement set forth, in detail, the work required to address the son's seemingly endless actions that delayed the proceeding and prevented an orderly distribution of the estate; the son filed numerous, unfounded motions and consistently opposed the actions taken by the executor and other heirs.Shafer v. Estate of Shafer, 2012 Ark. App. 177, 393 S.W.3d 565 (2012).

It was within the trial court's discretion to award attorney's fees to a successor trustee for services that were rendered in connection with the administration of an estate where it was apparent that there was a dispute regarding distribution that would require adjudication by a court, and the successor trustee had litigated whether certain items of real property were trust assets and also the efficacy of the trust documents created by the wife after her husband's death.Cason v. Lambert, 2015 Ark. App. 41, 454 S.W.3d 250 (2015).

Where those appealing from an order of the probate court allowing attorney's fees failed to bring up the testimony heard in the probate court, the Supreme Court presumed the court's action to have been correct. Brown v. Brown, 222 Ark. 832, 262 S.W.2d 896 (1953).

In an order to entitle an attorney to retain a commission out of moneys of an estate collected under the employment of the administrator, it was necessary to show that the probate court authorized the employment. Turner v. Tapscott, 30 Ark. 312 (1874), overruled, Pike v. Thomas, 62 Ark. 223, 35 S.W. 212 (1896) (decision under prior law).

This section specifically authorizes the personal representative to employ legal counsel and contemplates that counsel's fee will be paid by the estate, not the personal representative. Alexander v. First Nat'l Bank, 278 Ark. 406, 646 S.W.2d 684 (1983).

Probate courts can authorize the administrator to employ counsel in the necessary protection of the estate in his hands and may allow fees for such services rendered the administrator to protect and preserve the estate; however, the court has no jurisdiction to award fees for services rendered to an individual beneficiary. Croft v. Clark, 24 Ark. App. 16, 748 S.W.2d 149 (1988).

An attorney's fee was held in the same category as necessary expenses and, when allowed, should take its place in the account current, with the probate courts having jurisdiction. Kenyon v. Gregory, 127 Ark. 525, 192 S.W. 887 (1917) (decision under prior law).

Attorneys were not deprived of a property right without due process of law where their contract of employment with an administrator for the purpose of filing wrongful death action was terminated by probate court without notice to them or opportunity to be heard after appointment of successor administrator, since the order of court was purely prospective in operation and did not involve denial of due process. Gentry v. Richardson, 228 Ark. 677, 309 S.W.2d 721 (1958).

A party has no right to make a contract for legal services which is binding on a court; however a court has the power and jurisdiction to approve a claim for legal services made by a party where the court feels the claim is justified. Black v. Thompson, 237 Ark. 304, 372 S.W.2d 593 (1963).

Where there was no order of the probate court authorizing an administrator to employ an attorney, it was in the discretion of the court to allow him credit for fees paid to an attorney, and its order was conclusive where no abuse was shown. Reynolds v. Canal & Banking Co., 30 Ark. 520 (1875) (decision under prior law).
